Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.350

Multiple lane highway.

"Multiple lane highway" means any highway the roadway of which is of sufficient width to reasonably accommodate two or more separate lanes of vehicular traffic in the same direction, each lane of which shall be not less than the maximum legal vehicle width and whether or not such lanes are marked.

[ 1975 c 62 s 5; 1961 c 12 s 46.04.350. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 36; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 c 62: See note following RCW 36.75.010.